Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1510
Sale of cigarettes; contracts void.

Any contract, expressed or implied, made by any person in violation of any of the provisions of sections 59-1501 to 59-1518, is declared to be an illegal and void contract and no recovery thereon shall be made.

Laws 1965, c. 364, § 10, p. 1190.